Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.170

Contracts to lease building space and portable buildings, rent or have maintained security systems, computers, and other equipment, and provide pupil transportation services.

The board of directors of any school district may enter into contracts for their respective districts with public and private persons, organizations, and entities for the following purposes:

(1) To rent or lease building space and portable buildings for periods not exceeding ten years in duration;

(2) To rent security systems, computers, and other equipment or to have maintained and repaired security systems, computers, and other equipment for periods not exceeding five years in duration; and

(3) To provide pupil transportation services for periods not exceeding five years in duration.

No school district may enter into a contract for pupil transportation unless it has notified the superintendent of public instruction that, in the best judgment of the district, the cost of contracting will not exceed the projected cost of operating its own pupil transportation.

The budget of each school district shall identify that portion of each contractual liability incurred pursuant to this section extending beyond the fiscal year by amount, duration, and nature of the contracted service and/or item in accordance with rules and regulations of the superintendent of public instruction adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.505.140 and 28A.310.330.

The provisions of this section shall not have any effect on the length of contracts for school district employees specified by RCW 28A.400.300 and 28A.405.210.

[ 1999 c 386 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 360; 1987 c 141 s 1; 1985 c 7 s 93; 1982 c 191 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 210 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.131.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 141: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1987 c 141 s 3.]

Effective date—1982 c 191 ss 3 and 4: "The effective date of sections 3 and 4 of this amendatory act shall be September 1, 1982." [ 1982 c 191 s 13.]

Severability—1982 c 191: See note following RCW 28A.335.210.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 210: "If any provision of this 1977 act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 210 s 3.]